Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-216
Pledged securities; interest; company's right to collect.

The trust company may collect and retain the interest of all securities pledged as provided in section 8-209.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 13, p. 722;

C.S.1922, § 8075;

C.S.1929, § 8-213;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 79, p. 176;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-213;

R.S.1943, § 8-216;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 30.